Montana, session 2025, HB618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 5] may be cited as the "Montana
Individual Freedom Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" means any program or initiative of a state or local government
agency established for the purpose of:
(a) influencing hiring, employment, or recruitment practices with respect to race, color, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, or religion, other than through the use of color-blind and sex-neutral hiring or
recruitment processes in accordance with any applicable state and federal antidiscrimination laws;
(b) promoting differential treatment of or providing special benefits to individuals on the basis of
race, color, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, or religion;
(c) promoting policies or procedures designed or implemented in reference to race, color, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, or religion, other than policies or procedures approved in writing by the attorney
general's office for the sole purpose of ensuring compliance with any applicable court order or state or federal
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 618

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 618.1
law; or
(d) conducting trainings, programs, or activities designed or implemented in reference to race,
color, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, or religion, other than trainings, programs, or activities developed
by an attorney and approved in writing by the attorney general's office for the sole purpose of ensuring
compliance with any applicable court order or state or federal law.
(2) "State or local government agency" means:
(a) any branch, department, office, board, bureau, commission, agency, university unit, college, or
other instrumentality of state government; or
(b) a county, city, town, school district, or other unit of local government and any instrumentality of
local government.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Government agencies -- certain mandatory trainings and
employment practices prohibited -- expenditure of funds prohibited. (1) A state or local government
agency may not expend any funds, regardless of source, to purchase membership in or goods and services
from any organization that discriminates on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, or
religion.
(2) A state or local government agency may not expend any state, local, or federal funds to
promote, support, or maintain any programs that advocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion or to promote or
engage in political or social activism.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Department of military affairs or militia -- certain mandatory
trainings and recruitment practices prohibited -- expenditure of funds prohibited. (1) The department of
military affairs or militia may not expend any funds, regardless of source, to purchase membership in or goods
and services from any organization that discriminates on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, national origin, sex,
disability, or religion.
(2) The department of military affairs or militia may not expend any state, local, or federal funds to
promote, support, or maintain any programs that advocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion or to promote or
engage in political or social activism.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 618

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 618.1

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Enforcement. (1) The attorney general has the authority to investigate
alleged violations of [sections 1 through 5].
(2) The attorney general may adopt rules to establish procedures for investigating violations of
[sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be
codified as a new chapter in Title 49, and the provisions of Title 49 apply to [sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 618